North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47F. North Carolina Planned Community Act.
Article 3. Management of Planned Community.

§ 47F-3-101.
Organization of owners’ association.

A lot owners’ association shall be incorporated no later than the date the first lot in the planned community is conveyed. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all the lot owners or, following termination of the planned community, of all persons entitled to distributions of proceeds under

G.S. 47F-2-118

. Every association created after the effective date of this Chapter shall be organized as a nonprofit corporation.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-102.
Powers of owners’ association.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the declaration expressly provides to the contrary, the association may do all of the following:

Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations.

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from lot owners.

Hire and discharge managing agents and other employees, agents, and independent contractors.

Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings on matters affecting the planned community.

Make contracts and incur liabilities.

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements.

Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements.

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property, provided that common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest only pursuant to

G.S. 47F-3-112

.

Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements.

Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements other than the limited common elements and for services provided to lot owners.

Impose reasonable charges for late payment of assessments, not to exceed the greater of twenty dollars ($20.00) per month or ten percent (10%) of any assessment installment unpaid and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, suspend privileges or services provided by the association (except rights of access to lots) during any period that assessments or other amounts due and owing to the association remain unpaid for a period of 30 days or longer.

After notice and an opportunity to be heard, impose reasonable fines or suspend privileges or services provided by the association (except rights of access to lots) for reasonable periods for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association.

Impose reasonable charges in connection with the preparation and recordation of documents, including, without limitation, amendments to the declaration.

(13a)

Impose reasonable charges in connection with the preparation of statements of unpaid assessments, which must be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request, in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per statement or request, and an additional expedite fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) if the request is made within 48 hours of closing, all of which charges may be collected by the association, its managers, or its agents.

Provide for the indemnification of and maintain liability insurance for its officers, executive board, directors, employees, and agents.

Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments.

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this State by legal entities of the same type as the association.

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

History.

1998-199, s. 1; 2004-109, s. 4; 2005-422, s. 1; 2020-90, s. 4(c).

§ 47F-3-103.
Executive board members and officers.

Except as provided in the declaration, in the bylaws, in subsection (b) of this section, or in other provisions of this Chapter, the executive board may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, officers and members of the executive board shall discharge their duties in good faith. Officers shall act according to the standards for officers of a nonprofit corporation set forth in

G.S. 55A-8-42

, and members shall act according to the standards for directors of a nonprofit corporation set forth in

G.S. 55A-8-30

.

The executive board may not act unilaterally on behalf of the association to amend the declaration (G.S. 47F-2-117), to terminate the planned community (G.S. 47F-2-118), or to elect members of the executive board or determine the qualifications, powers and duties, or terms of office of executive board members (G.S. 47F-3-103(e)), but the executive board may unilaterally fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term. Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, the lot owners, by a majority vote of all persons present and entitled to vote at any meeting of the lot owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the executive board with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant.

Within 30 days after adoption of any proposed budget for the planned community, the executive board shall provide to all the lot owners a summary of the budget and a notice of the meeting to consider ratification of the budget, including a statement that the budget may be ratified without a quorum. The executive board shall set a date for a meeting of the lot owners to consider ratification of the budget, such meeting to be held not less than 10 nor more than 60 days after mailing of the summary and notice. There shall be no requirement that a quorum be present at the meeting. The budget is ratified unless at that meeting a majority of all the lot owners in the association or any larger vote specified in the declaration rejects the budget. In the event the proposed budget is rejected, the periodic budget last ratified by the lot owners shall be continued until such time as the lot owners ratify a subsequent budget proposed by the executive board.

The declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by the declarant, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board.

Not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the lot owners shall elect an executive board of at least three members, at least a majority of whom shall be lot owners. The executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board members and officers shall take office upon election.

The association shall publish the names and addresses of all officers and board members of the association within 30 days of their election.

History.

1998-199, s. 1; 2005-422, ss. 2, 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-422, ss. 2 and 3, effective January 1, 2006, and applicable to violations occurring and proceedings commenced on or after that date and to fiscal years beginning on or after that date, substituted “(G.S. 47F-3-103(e))” for “(G.S. 47F-3-103(f))” in subsection (b); and added subsection (f).

§ 47F-3-104.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

No special declarant right (G.S. 47F-1-103(28)) defined under this Chapter may be transferred except by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in every county in which any portion of the planned community is located. Except for the transfer of declarant rights pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed upon the transferor by this Chapter. Lack of privity does not deprive any lot owner of standing to maintain an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If a successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant (G.S. 47F-1-103(1)), the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligations or liabilities of the successor relating to the planned community.

If a transferor retains any special declarant rights but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on a declarant by this Chapter or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant rights and arising after the transfer.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument, deed of trust, or other agreement creating a security interest, in case of foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings of any lots owned by a declarant, or real estate in a planned community subject to development rights, or real estate subject to development rights for a planned community, a person acquiring title to all the property being foreclosed or sold, but only upon the person’s request in an instrument recorded in every county in which any portion of the planned community is located, succeeds to all special declarant rights (G.S. 47F-1-103(28)) related to that property held by that declarant and requested by the person acquiring title. The judgment or instrument conveying title shall provide for transfer of only the special declarant rights requested. The mortgage, deed of trust, tax lien, or other conveyance to be foreclosed under this subsection shall not be required to contain specific reference to an assignment of special declarant rights but shall be deemed to include the special declarant rights as part of the right, title, and interest encumbered by the mortgage, deed of trust, tax lien, or other conveyance.

Upon foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings of all interests in a planned community owned by a declarant, the declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights and the period of declarant control (G.S. 47F-3-103(d)) terminates unless either of the following applies:

The judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights held by that declarant to a successor declarant.

The declarant transferred special declarant rights related to the appointment of executive board members to another person pursuant to this section prior to the foreclosure or sale.

The liabilities and obligations of a person who succeeds to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this Chapter or by the declaration.

Unless otherwise specified in the declaration as to the holder of a mortgage instrument, deed of trust, or other agreement creating a security interest, in case of foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings, a successor to any special declarant right who is not an affiliate of a declarant, other than a successor described in subdivision (3) or (4) of this subsection, is subject to the obligations and liabilities expressly imposed by this Chapter or the declaration:

On a declarant which relate to the successor’s exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights; or

On his or her transferor, other than:

Misrepresentations by the transferor or any previous declarant;

Warranty obligations on improvements made by the transferor or any previous declarant or made before the planned community was created;

Obligations and liabilities arising out of contractual agreements between the transferor or any previous declarant and third parties other than the declaration;

Breach of any fiduciary obligation by the transferor or any previous declarant or his or her appointees to the executive board; or

Any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor or any previous declarant as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the planned community, and models, if the successor is not an affiliate of the declarant, may not exercise any other special declarant right and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant.

A successor to all special declarant rights held by a transferor who is not an affiliate of the declarant who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed or other instrument of conveyance in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title under subsection (c) of this section may declare in a recorded instrument the intention to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any lot or real estate subject to development rights owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than any right held by his or her transferor to control the executive board in accordance with

G.S. 47F-3-103(d)

for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant does not have the right to exercise special declarant rights under this subsection, the successor declarant is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for his or her acts and omissions under

G.S. 47F-3-103(d)

.

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant other than claims and obligations expressly arising under this Chapter or the declaration.

For purposes of this section, “assignment of declarant rights” shall include any assignment by the declarant of special declarant rights to a person, including, without limitation, an assignment pursuant to this section.

History.

1998-199, s. 1; 2014-57, s. 3.

§ 47F-3-105.
Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

If entered into before the executive board elected by the lot owners pursuant to

G.S. 47F-3-103(e)

takes office, any contract or lease affecting or related to the planned community that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the lot owners at the time entered into under the circumstances then prevailing, may be terminated without penalty by the association at any time after the executive board elected by the lot owners pursuant to

G.S. 47F-3-103(e)

takes office upon not less than 90 days’ notice to the other party.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-106.
Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association shall provide for:

The number of members of the executive board and the titles of the officers of the association;

Election by the executive board of officers of the association;

The qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing executive board members and officers and filling vacancies;

Which, if any, of its powers the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

The method of amending the bylaws.

The bylaws may provide for any other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-107.
Upkeep of planned community; responsibility and assessments for damages.

Except as otherwise provided in the declaration, G.S. 47F-3-113(h) or subsection (b) of this section, the association is responsible for causing the common elements to be maintained, repaired, and replaced when necessary and to assess the lot owners as necessary to recover the costs of such maintenance, repair, or replacement except that the costs of maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element shall be assessed as provided in G.S. 47F-3-115(c)(1). Except as otherwise provided in the declaration, each lot owner is responsible for the maintenance and repair of his lot and any improvements thereon. Each lot owner shall afford to the association and when necessary to another lot owner access through the lot owner’s lot or the limited common element allocated to the lot owner’s lot reasonably necessary for any such maintenance, repair, or replacement activity.

If a lot owner is legally responsible for damage inflicted on any common element or limited common element, the association may direct such lot owner to repair such damage, or the association may itself cause the repairs to be made and recover damages from the responsible lot owner.

If damage is inflicted on any lot by an agent of the association in the scope of the agent’s activities as such agent, the association is liable to repair such damage or to reimburse the lot owner for the cost of repairing such damages. The association shall also be liable for any losses to the lot owner.

When the claim under subsection (b) or (c) of this section is less than or equal to the jurisdictional amount established for small claims by

G.S. 7A-210

, any aggrieved party may request that a hearing be held before an adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive board to determine if a lot owner is responsible for damages to any common element or the association is responsible for damages to any lot. If the executive board fails to appoint an adjudicatory panel to hear such matters, hearings under this section shall be held before the executive board. Such panel shall accord to the party charged with causing damages notice of the charge, opportunity to be heard and to present evidence, and notice of the decision. This panel may assess liability for each damage incident against each lot owner charged or against the association not in excess of the jurisdictional amount established for small claims by

G.S. 7A-210

. When the claim under subsection (b) or (c) of this section exceeds the jurisdictional amount established for small claims by G.S. 7A-210, liability of any lot owner charged or the association shall be determined as otherwise provided by law. Liabilities of lot owners determined by adjudicatory hearing or as otherwise provided by law shall be assessments secured by lien under

G.S. 47F-3-116

. Liabilities of the association determined by adjudicatory hearing or as otherwise provided by law may be offset by the lot owner against sums owing to the association and if so offset, shall reduce the amount of any lien of the association against the lot at issue.

The association shall not be liable for maintenance, repair, and all other expenses in connection with any real estate which has not been incorporated into the planned community.

History.

1998-199, s. 1; 2013-34, s. 2.

§ 47F-3-107.1.
Procedures for fines and suspension of planned community privileges or services.

Unless a specific procedure for the imposition of fines or suspension of planned community privileges or services is provided for in the declaration, a hearing shall be held before the executive board or an adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive board to determine if any lot owner should be fined or if planned community privileges or services should be suspended pursuant to the powers granted to the association in

G.S. 47F-3-102(11)

and (12). Any adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive board shall be composed of members of the association who are not officers of the association or members of the executive board. The lot owner charged shall be given notice of the charge, opportunity to be heard and to present evidence, and notice of the decision. If it is decided that a fine should be imposed, a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) may be imposed for the violation and without further hearing, for each day more than five days after the decision that the violation occurs. Such fines shall be shall be assessments secured by liens under

G.S. 47F-3-116

. If it is decided that a suspension of planned community privileges or services should be imposed, the suspension may be continued without further hearing until the violation or delinquency is cured. The lot owner may appeal the decision of an adjudicatory panel to the full executive board by delivering written notice of appeal to the executive board within 15 days after the date of the decision. The executive board may affirm, vacate, or modify the prior decision of the adjudicatory body.

History.

1997-456, s. 27; 1998-199, s. 1; 2005-422, s. 4.

§ 47F-3-108.
Meetings.

A meeting of the association shall be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the executive board, or by lot owners having ten percent (10%), or any lower percentage specified in the bylaws, of the votes in the association. Not less than 10 nor more than 60 days in advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each lot or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the lot owner, or sent by electronic means, including by electronic mail over the Internet, to an electronic mailing address designated in writing by the lot owner. The notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget changes, and any proposal to remove a director or officer.

Meetings of the executive board shall be held as provided in the bylaws. At regular intervals, the executive board meeting shall provide lot owners an opportunity to attend a portion of an executive board meeting and to speak to the executive board about their issues or concerns. The executive board may place reasonable restrictions on the number of persons who speak on each side of an issue and may place reasonable time restrictions on persons who speak.

Except as otherwise provided in the bylaws, meetings of the association and the executive board shall be conducted in accordance with the most recent edition of Robert’s Rules of Order Newly Revised.

History.

1998-199, s. 1; 2004-109, s. 6; 2005-422, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-109, s. 6, effective July 17, 2004, inserted at the end of the third sentence “or sent by electronic means, including by electronic mail over the Internet, to an electronic mailing address designated in writing by the lot owner.”

Session Laws 2005-422, s. 5, effective January 1, 2006, and applicable to violations occurring and proceedings commenced on or after that date and to fiscal years beginning on or after that date, added the subsection (a) designation; and added subsections (b) and (c).

§ 47F-3-109.
Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast ten percent (10%) of the votes which may be cast for election of the executive board are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast fifty percent (50%) of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

In the event business cannot be conducted at any meeting because a quorum is not present, that meeting may be adjourned to a later date by the affirmative vote of a majority of those present in person or by proxy. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the declaration or the bylaws, the quorum requirement at the next meeting shall be one-half of the quorum requirement applicable to the meeting adjourned for lack of a quorum. This provision shall continue to reduce the quorum by fifty percent (50%) from that required at the previous meeting, as previously reduced, until such time as a quorum is present and business can be conducted.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-110.
Voting; proxies.

If only one of the multiple owners of a lot is present at a meeting of the association, the owner who is present is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that lot. If more than one of the multiple owners are present, the votes allocated to that lot may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the multiple owners, unless the declaration or bylaws expressly provide otherwise. Majority agreement is conclusively presumed if any one of the multiple owners casts the votes allocated to that lot without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the lot.

Votes allocated to a lot may be cast pursuant to a proxy duly executed by a lot owner. If a lot is owned by more than one person, each owner of the lot may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the lot through a duly executed proxy. A lot owner may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section except by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated. A proxy terminates 11 months after its date, unless it specifies a shorter term.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the planned community be cast by lessees rather than lot owners of leased lots, (i) the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply to lessees as if they were lot owners; (ii) lot owners who have leased their lots to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and (iii) lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were lot owners. Lot owners shall also be given notice, in the manner provided in

G.S. 47F-3-108

, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

No votes allocated to a lot owned by the association may be cast.

The declaration may provide that on specified issues only a defined subgroup of lot owners may vote provided:

The issue being voted is of special interest solely to the members of the subgroup; and

All except de minimis cost that will be incurred based on the vote taken will be assessed solely against those lot owners entitled to vote.

For purposes of subdivision (e)(1) above, an issue to be voted on is not a special interest solely to a subgroup if it substantially affects the overall appearance of the planned community or substantially affects living conditions of lot owners not included in the voting subgroup.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-111.
Tort and contract liability.

Neither the association nor any lot owner except the declarant is liable for that declarant’s torts in connection with any part of the planned community which that declarant has the responsibility to maintain.

An action alleging a wrong done by the association shall be brought against the association and not against a lot owner.

Any statute of limitation affecting the association’s right of action under this section is tolled until the period of declarant control terminates. A lot owner is not precluded from bringing an action contemplated by this section because the person is a lot owner or a member of the association.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-112.
Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

Portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree in writing to that action; provided that all the owners of lots to which any limited common element is allocated shall agree in order to convey that limited common element or subject it to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all the lots are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Distribution of proceeds of the sale of a limited common element shall be as provided by agreement between the lot owners to which it is allocated and the association. Proceeds of the sale or financing of a common element (other than a limited common element) shall be an asset of the association.

The association, on behalf of the lot owners, may contract to convey common elements or subject them to a security interest, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, free and clear of any interest of any lot owner or the association in or to the common element conveyed or encumbered, including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Any purported conveyance, encumbrance, or other voluntary transfer of common elements, unless made pursuant to this section is void.

No conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section may deprive any lot of its rights of access and support.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-113.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a lot to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available:

Property insurance on the common elements insuring against all risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against including fire and extended coverage perils. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be not less than eighty percent (80%) of the replacement cost of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

Liability insurance in reasonable amounts, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements.

If the insurance described in subsection (a) of this section is not reasonably available, the association promptly shall cause notice of that fact to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all lot owners. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association in any event may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the lot owners.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall provide that:

Each lot owner is an insured person under the policy to the extent of the lot owner’s insurable interest;

The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any lot owner or member of the lot owner’s household;

No act or omission by any lot owner, unless acting within the scope of the owner’s authority on behalf of the association, will preclude recovery under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a lot owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association’s policy provides primary insurance.

Any loss covered by the property policy under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for lot owners and lienholders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions of subsection (h) of this section, the proceeds shall be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and lot owners and lienholders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored, or the planned community is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a lot owner from obtaining insurance for the lot owner’s own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any lot owner, mortgagee, or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurer issuing the policy may not cancel or refuse to renew it until 30 days after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has been mailed to the association, each lot owner, and each mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust to whom certificates or memoranda of insurance have been issued at their respective last known addresses.

Any portion of the planned community for which insurance is required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section which is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless (i) the planned community is terminated, (ii) repair or replacement would be illegal under any State or local health or safety statute or ordinance, or (iii) the lot owners decide not to rebuild by an eighty percent (80%) vote, including one hundred percent (100%) approval of owners assigned to the limited common elements not to be rebuilt. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense. If any portion of the planned community is not repaired or replaced, (i) the insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements shall be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the planned community, (ii) the insurance proceeds attributable to limited common elements which are not rebuilt shall be distributed to the owners of the lots to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as their interests may appear, and (iii) the remainder of the proceeds shall be distributed to all the lot owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common expense liabilities of all the lots. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection,

G.S. 47F-2-118

(termination of the planned community) governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the planned community is terminated.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a planned community all of whose lots are restricted to nonresidential use.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-114.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, any surplus funds of the association remaining after payment of or provision for common expenses, the funding of a reasonable operating expense surplus, and any prepayment of reserves shall be paid to the lot owners in proportion to their common expense liabilities or credited to them to reduce their future common expense assessments.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.

§ 47F-3-115.
Assessments for common expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in the declaration, until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the association, assessments thereafter shall be made at least annually.

Except for assessments under subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section, all common expenses shall be assessed against all the lots in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration. Any past-due common expense assessment or installment thereof bears interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding eighteen percent (18%) per year. For planned communities created prior to January 1, 1999, interest may be charged on any past-due common expense assessment or installment only if the declaration provides for interest charges, and where the declaration does not otherwise specify the interest rate, the rate may not exceed eighteen percent (18%) per year.

To the extent required by the declaration:

Any common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element shall be assessed against the lots to which that limited common element is assigned, equally, or in any other proportion that the declaration provides;

Any common expense or portion thereof benefiting fewer than all of the lots shall be assessed exclusively against the lots benefitted; and

The costs of insurance shall be assessed in proportion to risk and the costs of utilities shall be assessed in proportion to usage.

Assessments to pay a judgment against the association may be made only against the lots in the planned community at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If any common expense is caused by the negligence or misconduct of any lot owner or occupant, the association may assess that expense exclusively against that lot owner or occupant’s lot.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment thereof not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

History.

1998-199, s. 1.